Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 10.1 Outdoor Advertising

24-10.1-1.
Declaration of policy.

In order to prevent unreasonable distraction of operators of motor vehicles, to prevent confusion with respect to compliance with traffic lights, signs, signals and regulations, to promote the safety, convenience, and enjoyment of travel upon highways within this state and to protect the public investment therein, to preserve and enhance the natural scenic beauty or aesthetic features of the highways and adjacent areas, and in the general welfare of the people of this state, the general assembly declares it to be the policy of this state that the erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising in areas adjacent to the rights-of-way of the interstate, primary, secondary road systems within this state shall be regulated in accordance with the terms of this chapter and the regulations promulgated by the director of transportation pursuant thereto and finds that all outdoor advertising which does not conform to the requirements of this chapter is a public nuisance. It is the intention of the general assembly in this chapter to provide a statutory basis for regulation of outdoor advertising consistent with the public policy relating to areas adjacent to the interstate and primary highway systems as declared by congress in title 23 of the United States Code, Highways. Further, the general assembly declares the policy also to regulate other roads within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 70; P.L. 1990, ch. 305, § 1.

24-10.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Information center” means an area or site established and maintained as safety rest areas for the purpose of informing the public of places of interest within the state and providing such other information as the director of transportation may consider desirable.

“Interstate system” means that portion of the national system of interstate and defense highways located within this state, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated, by the director of transportation, and approved pursuant to the provisions of title 23, United States Code, Highways.

“Maintenance” means the normal repair of outdoor advertising due to wear and tear. Maintenance shall not include the relocation nor the increase of advertisement size nor height. Maintenance shall not permit any alterations such as the addition of face lighting nor lit panels, moving parts, sparkling surfaces, cutouts nor temporary extensions of advertising space.

Maintenance shall permit the change in the advertisement copy by means of trivision technology or other equivalent technology approved by the department of transportation and, if necessary, the federal highway administration; provided, however, for each sign using such technology two (2) valid permits for signs of equivalent size shall be required. Provided, further, however, that in the event that a person, firm or corporation does not hold more than one permit, only one permit for signs of equivalent size shall be required.

“Outdoor advertising” means an outdoor sign, display, light, device, figure, painting, drawing, message, plaque, poster, billboard, structure, or other thing which is designed, intended or used to advertise or inform, any part of the advertising or information contents of which is visible from any place on the main-traveled way of the interstate, primary, or secondary systems.

“Primary systems” means that portion of connected main highways, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated, by the director of transportation, pursuant to the provisions of title 23, United States Code, Highways.

“Safety rest area” means an area or site established and maintained within or adjacent to the right-of-way by or under public supervision or control, for the convenience of the traveling public.

“Secondary systems” means that portion of state maintained roads that are neither interstate nor primary roads.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 440, § 1.

24-10.1-3.
Limitations of outdoor advertising devices.

No outdoor advertising shall be erected in this state except the following:

Directional and other official signs and notices erected, maintained, or authorized by a public agency or body, which signs and notices shall include, but not be limited to, signs and notices pertaining to natural wonders and scenic and historic attractions, as authorized or required by law.

Signs, displays, and devices advertising the sale or lease of property upon which they are located, subject, however, to the national standards as promulgated pursuant to the federal Highway Beautification Act of 1965.

Signs, displays, and devices advertising activities conducted on the property upon which they are located, subject, however, to the national standards as promulgated pursuant to the federal Highway Beautification Act of 1965 including spacing requirements of the Rhode Island department of transportation rules and regulations governing outdoor advertising, except for signs that are allowed to be relocated as permitted in subsection (5).

Bus shelters erected under the authority of the state department of transportation or Rhode Island public transit authority which shall be permitted no more than one two (2) sided sign. Each sign face shall be no more than twenty-four (24) square feet in size.

Lawfully permitted signs, displays, and devices already in existence may be relocated to other permitted locations with the approval of the appropriate governmental agency(s), provided that the relocated outdoor advertising remains the same or smaller in size, and that such outdoor advertising conforms and is consistent with the municipal comprehensive plan and related zoning requirements.

This chapter shall not preclude the maintenance of existing outdoor advertising.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 305, § 1.

24-10.1-4.
Regulation of advertising.

The director of transportation is hereby authorized to promulgate regulations governing the issuance of permits for the erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising coming within the exceptions contained in subsections (1), (4) and (5) of §

24-10.1-3

consistent with the safety and welfare of the traveling public, and as may be necessary to carry out the policy of the state declared in this chapter, and consistent with the national standards promulgated by the secretary of commerce pursuant to title 23, United States Code. All permit fees collected pursuant to regulations promulgated under this section shall be deposited in the intermodal surface transportation fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 2.

24-10.1-5.
Removal of nonconforming advertising.

Any sign, display, or device lawfully in existence along the interstate system or the primary system on May 6, 1966 and which is not in conformity with the provisions contained in this chapter shall not be required to be removed until July 1, 1970. Any other sign, display, or device lawfully erected which does not conform to this chapter shall not be required to be removed until the end of the fifth year after it becomes nonconforming.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 62.

24-10.1-6.
Compensation for removal of advertising.

Any person, firm, association, or corporation having any property interest either in any real property upon which is located any prohibited advertising sign, display, or device, or having any property interest in any prohibited advertising sign, display, or device, or having any property interest in both, shall be justly compensated by the director of transportation for any damages sustained by reason of the removal of the following prohibited advertising signs, displays, and devices:

Those lawfully in existence as of May 6, 1966.

Those lawfully on any highway made a part of the interstate or primary system on or after May 6, 1966 and before January 1, 1968.

Those lawfully erected on or after January 1, 1968.

Compensation is authorized to be paid only for the following:

The taking, by virtue of the enactment of this chapter, from the owner of a prohibited sign, display or device of all right, title, leasehold, and interest in the sign, display or device; and

The taking, by virtue of the enactment of this chapter, from the owner of the real property on which the prohibited sign, display, or device is located, of the right to erect and maintain such signs, displays, and devices thereon.

Any person or party so entitled to compensation who cannot agree with the director of transportation as to the amount of just compensation to which he or she is so entitled, by virtue of the enactment of this chapter, may within one year from the time that the removal of such advertising is required apply for the damages to the superior court in accordance with the procedures of §§

37-6-18

through

37-6-23

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 268, § 2.

24-10.1-7.
Unlawful advertising.

Any advertising device which violates the provisions of this chapter is hereby declared to be a public nuisance. The director of transportation shall give thirty (30) days’ notice, by certified mail, postage prepaid, to the owner of the land on which the advertising device is located to remove the device if it is a prohibited device or cause it to conform to regulations if it is an authorized device. If the owner of the property fails to act within thirty (30) days as required in the notice, the director of transportation, or any of the director’s authorized subordinates, may enter upon the real property where the outdoor advertising is located and abate and remove it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1.

24-10.1-8.
Penalty.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1.

24-10.1-9.
Interpretation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abrogate or affect the provisions of any lawful ordinance, regulation or resolution, which are more restrictive than the provisions of this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or the general or public laws to the contrary, the director of the department of transportation shall not regulate any on-premise or off-premise non-commercial protected speech contained within any advertising display authorized by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 234, § 1.

24-10.1-10.
Advertising in safety rest areas.

In order to provide information in the specific interest of the traveling public, the director of transportation is hereby authorized to maintain maps and to permit informational directories and advertising pamphlets to be made available at safety rest areas, and to establish information centers at safety rest areas for the purpose of informing the public of places of interest within the state and providing such other information as may be considered desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1.

24-10.1-11.
Agreements with the United States authorized.

The director of transportation is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with the United States secretary of commerce as provided by title 23, United States Code, relating to the control of outdoor advertising in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary systems, including the establishment of information centers at safety rest areas, and to take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of such an agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1.

24-10.1-12.
Severability.

If any section, clause, or provision of this chapter shall be held either unconstitutional or ineffective in whole or in part, to the extent that it is not unconstitutional or ineffective, it shall be valid and effective and no other section, clause or provision shall on account thereof be termed invalid or ineffective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 1.